Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-1301
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds and declares that when left untreated, substance use disorders and mental illness contribute to increased crime in Nebraska, cost millions of dollars in lost productivity, and contribute to the burden placed upon law enforcement, court, and correctional systems in Nebraska.

The Legislature also finds and declares that problem solving courts, including drug, veterans, mental health, driving under the influence, reentry, and other problem solving courts, are effective in reducing recidivism of persons who participate in and complete such courts. The Legislature recognizes that problem solving courts offer a person accused of drug, alcohol, and other offenses alternatives to traditional criminal justice proceedings or juvenile justice dispositions.

Laws 2004, LB 454, § 1;

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 6;

Laws 2016, LB919, § 1.